Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB6091.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 10. (1) Each school bus owned or operated by a public or private nonpublic school, an agent of a school, a private business, or a unit of government for the transportation of pupils to or from school or school-related events shall must meet or exceed the federal motor vehicle safety standards applicable to the construction and sale of that school bus and for all seating positions in that vehicle. A school or an agent of a school may transport pupils with disabilities in mobile seating devices in accordance with federal standards specifically applicable to such pupils, their wheelchairs, and related wheelchair securement and occupant protection systems. (2) A vehicle , other than a school bus, with a must not be used to transport pupils to or from school or school-related events in excess of that vehicle's manufacturer's rated seating capacity. of 11 or more passengers, including the driver, shall not be used to transport pupils to or from school or school-related events. This subsection does not apply to motor buses that are described in section 10a.